District of Columbia statutes.
Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking

26-1308

Reports to Superintendent of Banking and Financial Institutions

All companies organized under this chapter, or which shall, under the provisions of this chapter, become entitled to transact the business of a trust company, shall report to the Superintendent of Banking and Financial Institutions [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking] pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 7 of this title.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1304, ch. 854, § 720
Nov. 23, 1985, D.C. Law 6-63,§ 106(a)(7)
as added Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-107, § 2(k), 33 DCR 1168

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-408.
1973 Ed., § 26-308.